Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Sage Grouse Implementation Team

§ 9-19-101.
Sage grouse implementation team created; membership; duties.

There is created a sage grouse implementation team that shall consist of members appointed by the governor as provided in this subsection and members of the legislature as provided in subsection (b) of this section. Members of the implementation team appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve staggered terms of four (4) years. As terms of current implementation team members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four (4) year term. The implementation team members appointed by the governor shall consist of the following members:

Not less than two (2) members representing each of the following interests:

Agriculture;

Mining;

Oil and gas industry;

Conservation or sportsmen’s groups.

Not less than one (1) member representing each of the following interests:

County government;

Wind generation and transmission industry.

Not less than one (1) member representing each of the following agencies:

Wyoming game and fish commission;

Wyoming department of agriculture;

Wyoming department of environmental quality;

Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust fund board;

Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission; and

Wyoming office of state lands and investments.

The sage grouse implementation team shall include one (1) member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house and one (1) member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate.

The implementation team shall seek cooperation and participation from the following federal entities in carrying out its duties:

United States bureau of land management;

United States fish and wildlife service;

United States forest service;

United States natural resource conservation service.

The governor may remove any member appointed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The governor shall appoint a chairman and other officers deemed necessary from among the members. The implementation team may meet as often as deemed necessary by a majority of the implementation team or at the request of the chairman or the governor. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, members shall serve without salary but may, at the governor’s discretion, receive per diem and mileage for attending team meetings in the manner and amounts provided by law for state employees. Members who are government employees or public officials shall be considered on official business of their agency when performing duties as members of the implementation team. Legislative members shall be paid salary, per diem and mileage as provided in W.S.

28-5-101

when performing duties as members of the implementation team. Remaining members may, at the governor’s discretion, receive payment authorized by this subsection from the governor’s office.

The implementation team shall review data and make recommendations to the governor regarding actions and funding to maintain and enhance sage grouse populations and sage grouse habitats in Wyoming.

The implementation team shall make recommendations to the governor regarding regulatory actions necessary to maintain and enhance sage grouse populations and sage grouse habitats in Wyoming.

History:

2014 ch. 80, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2014, ch. 80, sections 2 and 3 provide: “Section 2. Notwithstanding
W.S. 9-19-101(a), the initial terms of the members of the sage grouse implementation team appointed by the governor shall be one (1) year for one-fourth (1/4) of the members, two (2) years for one-fourth (1/4) of the members, three (3) years for one-fourth (1/4) of the members and four (4) years for one-fourth (1/4) of the members. Section 3. There is appropriated ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative service office. This appropriation shall be expended for the purpose of paying salary, travel and per diem to the two (2) legislators who will serve on the sage grouse implementation team as required by this act.”